Washington statutes.
RCW 35.10.460

Consolidation—Ballot questions.

If a proposal for assumption of indebtedness is to be submitted to the voters of a city in which the indebtedness did not originate, the proposal shall be separately stated and the ballots shall contain, as a separate proposition to be voted on, the words "For Assumption of Indebtedness to be paid by the levy of annual property taxes in excess of regular property taxes" and "Against Assumption of Indebtedness to be paid by the levy of annual property taxes in excess of regular property taxes" or words equivalent thereto. If the question of the form or plan of government is to be submitted to the voters, the question shall be separately stated and the ballots shall contain, as a separate proposition to be voted on, the option of a voter to select one of the three forms or plans of government. If the question of the name of the proposed consolidated city is to be submitted to the voters, the question shall be separately stated and the ballots shall contain, as a separate proposition to be voted on, the option of a voter to select one of the names of the proposed consolidated city.

[ 1995 c 196 s 1; 1985 c 281 s 9.]